North Carolina, session 2025, HB333.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of G.S. 160D-202, or any other
provision of law, the City of Jacksonville shall not exercise any powers granted to cities in
Chapter 160D of the General Statutes in any area beyond its contiguous corporate limits.
SECTION 1.(b) The relinquishment of jurisdiction by the City of Jacksonville over
the area beyond its contiguous corporate limits shall become effective on the date this act
becomes law; provided, however, the City of Jacksonville's development regulations and powers
of enforcement shall remain in effect in that area until the time provided in G.S. 160D-202(h).
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*H333-v-1*